Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1005.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 2 and 3 of the act of July 6, 1984 (P.L.642, No.132), known as the Cash Consumer Protection Act, are amended to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Cash payment." A transaction conducted using physical legal tender issued by the United States Government, including paper 1234567891011121314151617181920 currency and coins. The term does not include electronic transfers, checks or any other form of payment."Credit card." A device or instrument which entitles the holder to obtain money, goods, services or anything of value on credit."Person." An individual, corporation, trust, partnership, limited partnership, incorporated or unincorporated association or other entity.Section 3. Refusal to provide property prohibited.It shall be unlawful for any person to refuse to rent or sell property or services to any individual for the reason that the individual does not possess a credit card. [Nothing] Except as provided under section 3.1, nothing in this section requires the acceptance of any particular form of payment.Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 3.1. Refusal to accept cash payment.It shall be unlawful for a seller of retail goods or services to refuse to accept cash payment for the sale of retail goods or services having a sales price of less than $500 when the purchaser is physically present at the point of sale. Nothing in this section shall apply to the sale of retail goods or services where the seller has a written policy that currency in excess of a certain denomination will not be accepted as payment and has posted the policy conspicuously for purchasers to view prior to the point of sale and the purchaser tenders cash payment in a denomination that exceeds the amount specified in the policy.Section 3. Sections 5, 8(b) and 9 of the act are amended to read:Section 5. Injunctive relief.Whenever the Attorney General or a district attorney has 20250SB1005PN1169 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reason to believe that any person is violating or is about to violate section 3, 3.1 or 4 and that proceedings would be in the public interest, the Attorney General or a district attorney may bring an action in the name of the Commonwealth against the person to restrain by temporary or permanent injunction violations of section 3, 3.1 or 4.Section 8. Civil penalties.* * *(b) Willful violations of act.--In any action brought under section 5, if the court finds that a person is willfully using or has willfully used a method, act or practice declared unlawful by section 3, 3.1 or 4, the Attorney General or the appropriate district attorney, acting in the name of the Commonwealth, may recover, on behalf of the Commonwealth, a civil penalty not exceeding $200 per violation, which civil penalty shall be in addition to other relief which may be granted under sections 5 and 6.Section 9. Private actions.(a) Amount of damages.--Any person who suffers any ascertainable loss of money or property, as a result of the use or employment by any person of a method, act or practice declared unlawful by section 3, 3.1 or 4 may bring a private action to recover actual damages or $100, whichever is greater. The court may, in its discretion, award up to three times the actual damages sustained, but not less than $100, and may provide additional relief as it deems necessary or proper. The court shall award reasonable attorney's fees to a person who prevails in an action brought pursuant to this subsection.(b) Injunction prima facie evidence of violation.--Any permanent injunction, judgment or order of the court made under 20250SB1005PN1169 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section 5 shall be prima facie evidence in an action brought under subsection (a) that the defendant used or employed acts or practices declared unlawful by section 3, 3.1 or 4.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1005PN1169 - 4 - 1234